Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions

27-4-70.
Fishing in waters not opened for commercial fishing.

It shall be unlawful to fish commercially except in waters opened for commercial fishing by regulation of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 91; Code 1933, § 45-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-71.
Commercial fishing for shad, American eels, catfish, and horseshoe crabs.

It shall be unlawful to fish commercially for shad, American eels, catfish in salt water, or horseshoe crabs except with a valid commercial fishing license as prescribed in Code Section 27-2-23 and a valid commercial fishing boat license as prescribed in Code Section 27-2-8. In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the commissioner may authorize any person so licensed to fish for shad, American eels, catfish in salt water, or horseshoe crabs.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing the seasons, days, and places; methods of fishing and disposition; and size, creel, and possession limits for fishing commercially for shad, American eels, catfish in salt water, and horseshoe crabs.

It shall be unlawful to fish commercially for shad, American eels, catfish in salt water, or horseshoe crabs except in compliance with the rules and regulations of the board pertaining to the seasons, days, and places; methods of fishing and disposition; and size, creel, and possession limits for fishing commercially for such species.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-805, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 54, 55; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 31; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 10/HB 869.

27-4-72.
[Reserved] Commercial eel fishing.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 63; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 33; Ga. L. 1979, p. 893, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 823, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 11/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 11/HB 869 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-73.
Confiscation and disposition of illegally used commercial fishing gear.

Should any law enforcement officer of this state or employee of the department discover any commercial fishing gear or any trap, net, seine, basket, or similar device for taking fish, which gear or device is being used in violation of this title, such officer or employee shall seize and hold the same. In the event no one within a reasonable time claims the seized commercial fishing gear and the owner thereof is unknown to such officer or employee, the gear shall be confiscated and shall become the property of the department and disposed of as ordered by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 91; Code 1933, § 45-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-74.
Sale, purchase, or transportation of game fish generally.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section and in Code Section 27-4-75, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell or purchase any game fish.

Game fish shipped into this state and accompanied by a bona fide bill of sale or lading giving the date of the transaction, the details of the source of the fish, and the species, number, and pounds thereof may be lawfully transported, sold, and resold, provided each person in possession thereof has the bill of sale or lading and has otherwise complied with this Code section and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section.

It shall be lawful for any person to sell or purchase game fish from a pond when the owner of the pond has obtained a valid permit from the department and the permit is displayed in a prominent place at the pond and the person shall have complied with all the requirements of this Code section and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section. The permit may be issued to the owner only once annually and shall limit the time for taking fish from the pond to 15 days unless an extension is granted by the department. However, no person shall sell, purchase, or possess any game fish taken from such a pond unless the fish are packaged and labeled with the pond permit number and the number and pounds of each species of fish contained therein. The fish shall remain so packaged until processed for consumption or released into another body of water.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this title to the contrary, American shad, hickory shad, flathead catfish, and channel catfish harvested from Georgia waters other than private ponds in the course of commercial fishing as that term is defined in Code Section 27-1-2 shall not be subject to the prohibitions set forth in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 85; Ga. L. 1957, p. 340, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 897, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-808, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 56; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 600, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “fish, and” was substituted for “fish and” in subsection (b).

27-4-74.1.
[Repealed] Food fish dealers.

History.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 172, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1987, p. 908, § 2, effective July 1, 1987.

27-4-75.
Sale of fish by commercial fish hatcheries; sale of game fish; bill of sale or lading for possession of certain game fish and domestic fish; sale of diseased fish.

It shall be unlawful to sell any fish from a commercial fish hatchery as defined in Code Section 27-1-2 unless the hatchery is licensed under Code Section 27-2-23 or except as follows:

Fish may be sold as provided in Code Section 27-4-74 or 27-4-76; and

Domestic fish as defined in paragraph (23) of Code Section 27-1-2 and that are produced by an aquaculturist registered under Code Section 27-4-255.

Except as provided in Code Section 27-4-74 and except for persons licensed as wholesale or retail fish dealers as provided in Code Section 27-4-76, it shall be unlawful for anyone other than a commercial fish hatchery licensed under Code Section 27-2-23 to sell any species of game fish. It shall also be unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession any such game fish obtained from a commercial fish hatchery, wholesale fish dealer, or retail fish dealer or domestic fish from an aquaculturist registered under Code Section 27-4-255 without a bona fide bill of sale or lading which provides the date of transaction, identifies the seller, and details at least two of the following three criteria for each species of fish contained therein: number, weight, or average length.

It shall also be unlawful to sell fish from a commercial fish hatchery which the department has determined to have diseases or parasites which would be harmful to native fish populations.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 897, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-809, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1207, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1579, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 600, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 1-1, repealed the provisions of the Georgia Pacific White Shrimp Development Aquaculture Act, effective July 1, 2019.
As a result, the amendment by Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-4, which was never funded and therefore remained dormant, is now moot.

27-4-76.
Licensing of wholesale and retail fish dealers; sale, transportation into state, or possession of live fish and fish eggs.

It shall be unlawful to engage in the business of a wholesale or retail fish dealer, as defined in Code Section 27-1-2, without first obtaining an annual license from the department as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. Properly licensed wholesale fish dealers or retail fish dealers may sell game fish obtained from a licensed fish hatchery or domestic fish obtained from a registered aquaculturist or as otherwise provided in Code Section 27-4-74. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, a licensed commercial fish hatchery shall not be required to obtain a license as a wholesale fish dealer or a retail fish dealer.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, nonresident persons may sell and transport fish and fish eggs into the state without being required to procure a wholesale fish dealer license where the sale and shipment are made to a wholesale fish dealer duly licensed under Code Section 27-2-23.

The board may by regulation prohibit or limit the importation, possession, or sale in this state of live fish or fish eggs where the same are found to be harmful to endemic fish populations or where the importation, possession, or sale might introduce or spread disease or parasites.

The game wardens or other agents or officials of the department shall confiscate any fish imported, purchased, or acquired by any person in violation of this Code section or any regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 332, § 5; Ga. L. 1945, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 231, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-810, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 58, 59; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, § 12; Ga. L. 1979, p. 893, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1460, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1207, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1579, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 6; Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-5; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” near the beginning of subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “aquaculturist” was substituted for “acquaculturalist” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 1-1, repealed the provisions of the Georgia Pacific White Shrimp Development Aquaculture Act, effective July 1, 2019.
As a result, the amendment by Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-5, which was never funded and therefore remained dormant, is now moot.

27-4-77.
Suspension of license for violation of article.

Upon a conviction of any person for the violation of any of the provisions of this article, all licenses held by any such person to fish commercially or operate or use commercial fishing gear in the public impounded waters or navigable streams of this state may, at the option of the court, be forfeited for a period of six months from the date of conviction.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-817, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-78.
Governance of food fish processing plants.

Any food fish processing plant shall be governed by the provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 26 as such provisions apply to meat and poultry processing plants.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1207, § 4; Code 1981, §

27-4-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1579, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 7.